Maryland, session 2025, SB0014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
19–505.
(c) (1) An insurer may exclude from the coverage described in this section
benefits for:
(i) an individual, otherwise insured under the policy, who:
1. intentionally causes the motor vehicle accident resulting
in the injury for which benefits are claimed;
2. is a nonresident of the State and is injured as a pedestrian
in a motor vehicle accident that occurs outside of the State;
3. is injured in a motor vehicle accident while operating or
voluntarily riding in a motor vehicle that the individual knows is stolen; or
4. is injured in a motor vehicle accident while committing a
felony or while violating § 21–904 of the Transportation Article; or
(ii) the named insured or a family member of the named insured who
resides in the named insured’s household for an injury that occurs while the named insured
or family member is occupying an uninsured motor vehicle owned by:
1. the named insured; or
2. an immediate family member of the named insured who
resides in the named insured’s household.
(2) In the case of ELECTRIC BICYCLES, motorcycles, mopeds, or motor
scooters, an insurer may:
(i) exclude the economic loss benefits described in this section; or
(ii) offer the economic loss benefits with deductibles, options, or
specific exclusions.
Article – Transportation

SENATE BILL 14 3
11–117.1.
(a) “Electric bicycle” means a vehicle that:
(1) Is designed to be operated by human power with the assistance of an
electric motor;
(2) Is equipped with fully operable pedals;
(3) Has two or three wheels;
(4) Has a motor with a rating of 750 watts or less; and
(5) Meets one of the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.
(b) (1) A Class 1 electric bicycle is equipped with a motor that provides
assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle
reaches a speed of 20 miles per hour.
(2) A Class 2 electric bicycle is equipped with a motor that provides
assistance whether or not the rider is pedaling the bicycle and ceases to provide assistance
when the bicycle reaches a speed of 20 miles per hour.
(3) A Class 3 electric bicycle is equipped with a motor that provides
assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle
reaches a speed of 28 miles per hour.
13–102.
A certificate of title is not required for:
(1) A vehicle owned and used by the United States, unless it is registered
in this State;
(2) A new vehicle owned by a manufacturer or dealer and held for sale,
even though incidentally moved on the highway or used for purposes of testing or
demonstration or used as allowed under § 13–621 of this title;
(3) A vehicle used by a manufacturer only for testing;
(4) A vehicle owned by a nonresident of this State and not required by law
to be registered in this State;
(5) A vehicle regularly engaged in the interstate transportation of people
or property and for which a currently effective certificate of title has been issued in another
state;

SENATE BILL 14
(6) A vehicle moved only by human or animal power;
(7) A bicycle, except for a moped OR AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE;
(8) A vehicle in which interest has passed to a secured party on default of
the owner;
(9) Farm equipment;
(10) Special mobile equipment;
(11) A self–propelled invalid:
(i) Wheelchair; or
(ii) Tricycle;
(12) A trailer, other than a camping trailer, rated by the manufacturer as
having a gross vehicle weight of 2,500 pounds or less; or
(13) An off–highway recreational vehicle purchased before October 1, 2010.
13–104.
(a) (1) The application for a certificate of title of a vehicle shall be made by the
owner of the vehicle on the form that the Administration requires.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an application for a
certificate of title of an off–highway recreational vehicle, AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE, a motor
scooter, or a moped shall be made by electronic transmission under § 13–610 of this title.
(3) The owner of [a] AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE, A motor scooter, or A moped
shall certify at the time of titling that the ELECTRIC BICYCLE, motor scooter, or moped is
covered by the required security described in § 17–103 of this article.
13–106.
(a) The Administration shall:
(1) File each application for a certificate of title that it receives; and
(2) Issue a certificate of title of the vehicle if:
(i) It finds that the applicant is entitled to the certificate of title; and
(ii) It has received the required fees.

SENATE BILL 14 5
(b) The Administration shall keep a record of all certificates of title that it issues,
as follows:
(1) Under a distinctive title number assigned to the vehicle;
(2) Under the vehicle identification number of the vehicle or, if a
distinguishing number has been assigned to it, under the distinguishing number; and
(3) Under any other method that the Administration determines.
(c) Upon receipt with the application for a certificate of title, the Administration
shall maintain a record of the following documents as a part of its certificate of title records
for a motor vehicle:
(1) A notice from a dealer under § 14–1502(f)(1) of the Commercial Law
Article;
(2) A notice from a manufacturer or factory branch under § 14–1502(f)(2)
of the Commercial Law Article; and
(3) A manufacturer’s disclosure form provided to the Administration under
§ 14–1502(g) of the Commercial Law Article.
(d) (1) The Administration shall issue a permanent decal to the owner of a
motor scooter [or], A moped, OR AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE for which a certificate of title is
issued.
(2) An owner of a motor scooter [or], A moped, OR AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE
for which a certificate of title is issued shall display the decal on the vehicle as prescribed
by the Administration.
(3) A decal shall display a unique number sequence assigned by the
Administration.
(4) The Administration:
(i) Shall establish a fee of $5 for a decal; and
(ii) May adopt regulations to implement this section.
13–402.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or elsewhere in the
Maryland Vehicle Law, each motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer driven on
a highway, AND EACH ELECTRIC BICYCLE, shall be registered under this subtitle.
13–403.

SENATE BILL 14
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the owner of a
vehicle subject to registration under this subtitle shall apply to the Administration for the
registration of the vehicle in a manner that the Administration requires.
(2) The application for registration of a low speed vehicle OR AN ELECTRIC
BICYCLE shall be made by electronic transmission under § 13–610 of this title.
(b) The application shall contain the information that the Administration
reasonably requires to determine if the vehicle is entitled to registration.
(c) If a licensed dealer holds a low speed vehicle for sale and transfers the vehicle
to a person other than another licensed dealer, the dealer shall:
(1) Obtain from the transferee a completed application;
(2) Collect all fees required to register the low speed vehicle under this
subtitle; and
(3) Within 30 days of the date of delivery of the low speed vehicle,
electronically transmit the application and fees in accordance with § 13–610 of this title.
13–407.
The Administration shall:
(1) File each application for registration that it receives;
(2) Register the described vehicle if it finds that the applicant is entitled to
the registration; and
(3) Keep a record of the registration in a manner that permits identification
of the vehicle and its owner.
13–408.
When it registers a vehicle, the Administration shall issue and deliver to the owner
a registration card that contains:
(1) The date issued;
(2) The name and Maryland address of the owner;
(3) The registration number assigned by the Administration to the vehicle;
and
(4) Such description of the vehicle as the Administrator determines.

SENATE BILL 14 7
13–424.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO ELECTRIC BICYCLES.
(B) IF THE OWNER OF AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE IS A MINOR, THE PARENT OR
GUARDIAN OF THE MINOR SHALL APPLY TO THE ADMINISTRATION FOR THE
REGISTRATION OF THE ELECTRIC BICYCLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) EACH ELECTRIC BICYCLE REGISTRATION AND RENEWAL EXPIRES 2
YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF ISSUANCE.
(D) EACH ELECTRIC BICYCLE REGISTERED SHALL POSSESS OR BE
ASSIGNED BY THE ADMINISTRATION A REGISTRATION NUMBER, WHICH SHALL BE
AFFIXED TO THE BICYCLE IN A MANNER THAT THE ADMINISTRATION REQUIRES.
13–802.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and § 13–805 of this
subtitle, the fee for each certificate of title issued under this title is $100.
(b) (1) The fee for each certificate of title issued for a rental vehicle is $50.
(2) The fee for each certificate of title issued for an off–highway
recreational vehicle is $35.
(3) The fee for each certificate of title issued for AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE,
a motor scooter, or a moped is $20.
(4) The fee for each certificate of title issued for a trailer with a gross
vehicle weight of 3,000 pounds or less is $50 if:
(i) The trailer is transferred to:
1. A spouse, child, grandchild, parent, sibling, grandparent,
father–in–law, mother–in–law, son–in–law, or daughter–in–law of the transferor; or
2. A niece or nephew of the transferor if the transferor is at
least 65 years of age at the time of the transfer; and
(ii) No money or other valuable consideration is involved in the
transfer.
(5) On the death of a joint owner of a vehicle, the Administration may not
charge a fee for a new certificate of title issued for the vehicle to another joint owner who
is the surviving spouse.

SENATE BILL 14
(6) On the death of a sole owner of a vehicle, the Administration may not
charge a fee for a new certificate of title issued for the vehicle to a surviving spouse if
ownership of the vehicle is transferred in accordance with § 13–114 of this title.
(c) The Administration may not charge a fee for a certificate of title issued for a
vehicle that is transferred to a trust or from a trust to one or more beneficiaries in
accordance with § 14.5–1001 of the Estates and Trusts Article.
13–939.3.
FOR AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE AS DEFINED IN § 11–117.1 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE
ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE IS $30.
17–103.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, the form
of security required under this subtitle is a vehicle liability insurance policy written by an
insurer authorized to write these policies in this State.
(2) The Administration may accept another form of security in place of a
vehicle liability insurance policy if it finds that the other form of security adequately
provides the benefits required by subsection (b) of this section.
(3) (i) 1. In this paragraph the following words have the meanings
indicated.
2. “Affiliate” means any company that controls, is controlled
by, or is under common control with another company.
3. “Provide taxicab services”, “transportation network
company”, and “transportation network operator” have the meanings stated in § 10–101 of
the Public Utilities Article.
(ii) The Administration may accept another form of security from a
transportation network company in place of an insurance policy required by § 10–405 of the
Public Utilities Article if:
1. The other form of security adequately provides the
benefits required by § 10–405 of the Public Utilities Article; and
2. The transportation network company is an affiliate of a
company that provides taxicab services and has no fewer than 26 nor more than 300
transportation network operators.

SENATE BILL 14 9
(4) The Administration shall, by regulation, assess each self–insurer an
annual sum which may not exceed $750, and which shall be used for actuarial studies and
audits to determine financial solvency.
(b) The security required under this subtitle shall provide for at least:
(1) The payment of claims for bodily injury or death arising from an
accident of up to $30,000 for any one person and up to $60,000 for any two or more persons,
in addition to interest and costs;
(2) The payment of claims for property of others damaged or destroyed in
an accident of up to $15,000, in addition to interest and costs;
(3) Unless waived under § 19–506 of the Insurance Article or rejected
under § 19–506.1 of the Insurance Article, the benefits described under § 19–505 of the
Insurance Article as to basic required primary coverage;
(4) The benefits required under § 19–509 or § 19–509.1 of the Insurance
Article as to required additional coverage; and
(5) For vehicles subject to the provisions of § 25–111.1 of this article, the
security requirements adopted under 49 C.F.R., Part 387.
17–104.1.
The operator of AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE, A moped, or A motor scooter shall carry
evidence of the required security when operating the ELECTRIC BICYCLE, moped, or motor
scooter.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.